Massachusetts, session 194th, H5389.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, Michael
Marchand, the chief of the fire department of the town of Upton, may continue to serve in such
position until he reaches the age of 70, the date of his retirement or the date he is relieved of his
duties by the select board or town manager, at their discretion, whichever occurs first; provided,
however, that he is mentally and physically capable of performing the duties of his office. The
select board or town manager may, at the town's expense, require that Michael Marchand be
examined annually by a physician designated by the select board or town manager to determine
his physical and mental capability to perform the duties of his office.
SECTION 2. No further deductions shall be made from the regular compensation of
Michael Marchand pursuant to chapter 32 of the General Laws for any service performed
subsequent to him reaching the age of 65. Upon his retirement for superannuation, Michael
of 2

Marchand shall receive a superannuation retirement allowance equal to the allowance that he
would have been entitled to receive had he retired upon reaching age 65.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 2